Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-819
Judges; full term;
commencement; end.

The full term of office of each judge shall commence: (1) On
the first Thursday after the first Tuesday in January next succeeding the
election referred to in sections 24-813 to 24-818, or (2) if appointed pursuant
to Article V of the Constitution of Nebraska, on the date of his or her appointment, as the case may be. For purposes of sections 24-817 and 24-818,
the end of the term of office shall be the first Thursday after the first
Tuesday in January next succeeding the retention election required by section
24-814.

Laws 1969, c. 178, § 8, p. 768;

Laws 2009, LB343, § 1.

Action of Legislature in adopting this section simply declaratory of Constitution. Garrotto v. McManus, 185 Neb. 644, 177 N.W.2d 570 (1970).